Utah statutes.
34A-2-801.   Initiating adjudicative proceedings -- Procedure for review of
administrative action.
(1) (a)  To contest an action of the employee's employer or its insurance
carrier concerning a compensable industrial accident or occupational disease
alleged by the employee or a dependent any of the following shall file an
application for hearing with the Division of Adjudication:
(i)  the employee;
(ii)  a representative of the employee, the qualifications of whom are defined
in rule by the commission; or
(iii)  a dependent as described in Section 34A-2-403.
(b)  To appeal the imposition of a penalty or other administrative act imposed
by the division on the employer or its insurance carrier for failure to comply
with this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, any of the
following shall file an application for hearing with the Division of
Adjudication:
(i)  the employer;
(ii)  the insurance carrier; or
(iii)  a representative of either the employer or the insurance carrier, the
qualifications of whom are defined in rule by the commission.
(c)  A person providing goods or services described in Subsections
34A-2-407(11) and 34A-3-108(12) may file an application for hearing in
accordance with Section 34A-2-407 or 34A-3-108.
(d)  An attorney may file an application for hearing in accordance with
Section 34A-1-309.
(2)  Unless a party in interest appeals the decision of an administrative law
judge in accordance with Subsection (3), the decision of an administrative law
judge on an application for hearing filed under Subsection (1) is a final
order of the commission 30 days after the day on which the decision is issued.
(3) (a)  A party in interest may appeal the decision of an administrative law
judge by filing a motion for review with the Division of Adjudication within
30 days of the date the decision is issued.
(b)  Unless a party in interest to the appeal requests under Subsection (3)(c)
that the appeal be heard by the Appeals Board, the commissioner shall hear the
review.
(c)  A party in interest may request that an appeal be heard by the Appeals
Board by filing the request with the Division of Adjudication:
(i)  as part of the motion for review; or
(ii)  if requested by a party in interest who did not file a motion for
review, within 20 days of the day on which the motion for review is filed with
the Division of Adjudication.
(d)  A case appealed to the Appeals Board shall be decided by the majority
vote of the Appeals Board.
(4)  All records on appeals shall be maintained by the Division of
Adjudication.  Those records shall include an appeal docket showing the
receipt and disposition of the appeals on review.
(5)  Upon appeal, the commissioner or Appeals Board shall make its decision in
accordance with Section 34A-1-303.
(6)  The commissioner or Appeals Board shall promptly notify the parties to a
proceeding before it of its decision, including its findings and conclusions.
(7)  The decision of the commissioner or Appeals Board is final unless within
30 days after the date the decision is issued further appeal is initiated
under the provisions of this section or Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act.
(8) (a)  Within 30 days after the day on which the decision of the
commissioner or Appeals Board is issued, an aggrieved party may secure
judicial review by commencing an action in the court of appeals against the
commissioner or Appeals Board for the review of the decision of the
commissioner or Appeals Board.
(b)  In an action filed under Subsection (8)(a):
(i)  any other party to the proceeding before the commissioner or Appeals
Board shall be made a party; and
(ii)  the commission shall be made a party.
(c)  A party claiming to be aggrieved may seek judicial review only if the
party exhausts the party’s remedies before the commission as provided by
this section.
(d)  At the request of the court of appeals, the commission shall certify and
file with the court all documents and papers and a transcript of all testimony
taken in the matter together with the decision of the commissioner or Appeals
Board.
